Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20262-501
Act, how cited.

Sections 2-501 to 2-518 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Hemp Farming Act.

Laws 2019, LB657, § 1;

Laws 2024, LB262, § 1.